Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. Virginia Solar Energy Center.

§ 45.2-1900.
Virginia Solar Energy Center; purposes.

The Virginia Solar Energy Center (the Center) is established as part of the Department. The purposes of the Center are to (i) serve the people of the Commonwealth as a clearinghouse to gather, maintain, and disseminate general and technical information on solar energy and its utilization; (ii) coordinate programs for solar energy data-gathering in the Commonwealth; (iii) coordinate efforts and programs on solar energy with other state agencies and institutions, other states, and federal agencies; (iv) promote cooperation among and between Virginia business, industry, and agriculture and the public related to the use of solar energy; (v) develop public education programs on solar energy for use in schools and by the public; and (vi) provide assistance in formulating policies on the utilization of solar energy that would be in the best interest of the Commonwealth.

The Center may receive nonstate funds for the purposes provided in this section.

History.

1984, c. 590, § 45.1-391; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.